Nevada, session 83, SB215.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 501 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Commission shall adopt regulations requiring the
Department to issue salvage permits that authorize a person to
salvage and collect any wildlife killed as a result of a vehicle
collision or any other incidental event. The regulations adopted by
the Commission pursuant to this section may prohibit the
Department from issuing salvage permits if any wildlife in this
State is confirmed to have tested positive for chronic wasting
disease.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. The Commission may not prescribe a fee for the issuance
of a salvage permit pursuant to the regulations of the Commission
adopted pursuant to this section.
Sec. 2. NRS 502.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
502.150 1. [Whenever] Except as otherwise provided in the
regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant to section 1 of
this act, whenever tags are required for any species of wildlife, it is
unlawful to have any of that species in possession without the
correct tag. Before transporting any species of wildlife, or parts
thereof, for which a tag is required, the holder of:
(a) A paper tag must attach the tag to the animal; or
(b) An electronic tag must validate the tag in accordance with
the regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant to
NRS 502.160.
 Possession of any species of wildlife, or parts thereof, for which a
tag is required without an attached or validated tag, as applicable, is
prima facie evidence that the game is illegally taken and possessed.
2. It is unlawful to remove any tag from any wildlife for reuse
or to be in possession of excess tags or used tags.
3. [Whenever] Except as otherwise provided in the
regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant to section 1 of
this act, whenever tags are required for any species of fur-bearing
mammal, possession of a pelt of that species without the tag
attached thereto or validated, as applicable, is prima facie evidence
that such pelt is illegally taken and possessed.
Sec. 3. NRS 503.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
503.030 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section [,] or
in the regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant to section
1 of this act, it is unlawful for any person to have in his or her
control any wildlife or any part thereof, the killing of which is at any
time prohibited, during the time when such killing is prohibited, and
the possession of such wildlife shall be prima facie evidence that it
was the property of the State at the time it was caught, taken or
killed in this State when the killing was unlawful, and that such
taking or killing occurred in the closed season.
2. Wildlife legally taken may be stored in the home of the
owner after the end of the open season for hunting or fishing for it
and may be stored in a public warehouse or commercial refrigerator
locker under such rules as may be adopted by the Commission, but
in no case shall more than the amount designated by law as the legal
possession limit be so kept or stored.
3. The Commission is authorized to make rules requiring
evidence of legal taking in this State, or legal taking under the laws
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
of the state where taken, to be provided in the case of wildlife kept
or stored after the appropriate open season ends in the form of tags,
certificates or otherwise, if deemed necessary or convenient for the
enforcement of this title.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)